Washington statutes.
RCW 11.11.901

Application of chapter.

This chapter applies to any will of an owner who dies while a resident of this state on or after July 1, 1999, regardless of whether the will was executed or republished before or after July 1, 1999, and regardless of whether the beneficiary of the nonprobate asset was designated before or after July 1, 1999.

[ 1998 c 292 s 116.]